California, session 20252026, AB2154.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Title 1.81.8 (commencing with Section 1798.400) is added to Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, to read:TITLE 1.81.8. Mortgage Applicant Personal Information1798.400. A person shall not sell to a third party personal information of a mortgage applicant that was collected by the person during the mortgage application process.